zh-CN: 下巴带类型: 凸轮锁扣; 硬下巴托; 无; 棘轮锁扣; 软下巴托; 其他
da: Type af hagerem: Cam-Loc; Hård skål; Ingen; Ratchet-Loc; Blød skål; Andet
it: Tipo sottogola: Cam-Loc; Coppa rigida; Nessuno; Ratchet-Loc; Coppa morbida; Altro
pl: Typ paska pod brodę: Cam-Loc; Twarda miseczka; Brak; Ratchet-Loc; Miękka miseczka; Inny
el: Τύπος λουριού πηγουνιού: Cam-Loc; Σκληρό κύπελλο; Κανένα; Ratchet-Loc; Μαλακό κύπελλο; Άλλο
tr: Çene kayışı tipi: Cam-Loc; Sert kap; Yok; Ratchet-Loc; Yumuşak kap; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de correia de queixo: Cam-Loc; Copa dura; Nenhum; Ratchet-Loc; Copa macia; Outro
vi: Loại dây đeo cằm: Cam-Loc; Đệm cằm cứng; Không có; Ratchet-Loc; Đệm cằm mềm; Khác
ja: あご紐タイプ: Cam-Loc; ハードカップ; なし; Ratchet-Loc; ソフトカップ; その他
hu: Állpánt típusa: Cam-Loc; Kemény csésze; Nincs; Ratchet-Loc; Puha csésze; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ podbradného remienka: Cam-Loc; Tvrdý chránič; Žiadny; Ratchet-Loc; Mäkký chránič; Iné
th: แบบสายรัดคาง: Cam-Loc; คัพแข็ง; ไม่มี; Ratchet-Loc; คัพนิ่ม; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de jugular/cinta de queixo: Cam-Loc; Concha rígida; Nenhum; Ratchet-Loc; Concha macia; Outro
fr: Type de sangle mentonnière: Cam-Loc; Mentonnière rigide; Aucun; Ratchet-Loc; Mentonnière souple; Autre
en: Chinstrap type: Cam-Loc; Hard cup; None; Ratchet-Loc; Soft cup; Other
de: Kinnriementyp: Cam-Loc; Hartschale; Keine; Ratchet-Loc; Soft-Cup; Sonstige
fi: Leukahihnatyyppi: Cam-Loc; Kova kuppi; Ei mitään; Ratchet-Loc; Pehmeä kuppi; Muu
nl: Kinband type: Cam-Loc; Harde cup; Geen; Ratchet-Loc; Zachte cup; Anders
hr-HR: Vrsta podbradnog remena: Cam-Loc; Tvrda čašica; Nijedan; Ratchet-Loc; Meka čašica; Ostalo
zh-TW: 下巴帶類型: Cam-Loc; 硬式護顎; 無; Ratchet-Loc; 軟式護顎; 其他
sv: Hakremstyp: Cam-Loc; Hård kupa; Ingen; Ratchet-Loc; Mjuk kupa; Annan
ko: 턱끈 유형: 캠록(Cam-Loc); 하드 컵; 없음; 래칫록(Ratchet-Loc); 소프트 컵; 기타
es: Tipo de correa para la barbilla: Cam-Loc; Copa dura; Ninguno; Ratchet-Loc; Copa blanda; Otro
bg-BG: Тип каишка под брадичката: Cam-Loc; Твърда чашка; Няма; Ratchet-Loc; Мека чашка; Друго
cs: Typ podbradníku: Cam-Loc; Tvrdá krytka; Žádný; Ratchet-Loc; Měkká krytka; Jiné
nb: Hakestropptype: Cam-Loc; Hard kopp; Ingen; Ratchet-Loc; Myk kopp; Annen
lt-LT: Smakro dirželio tipas: „Cam-Loc“; Kietas kaušelis; Nėra; „Ratchet-Loc“; Minkštas kaušelis; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta traku podbradnika: Cam-Loc; Trda čašica; Brez; Ratchet-Loc; Mehka čašica; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip curea de bărbie: Cam-Loc; Cupă rigidă; Fără; Ratchet-Loc; Cupă moale; Altele
ru: Тип подбородочного ремня: Cam-Loc; Жесткая чашечка; Нет; Ratchet-Loc; Мягкая чашечка; Другой